Utah statutes.
35A-4-503.   Destruction or disposal of records or reports by division --
Procedure.
The division may destroy or dispose of reports or records as have been
properly recorded or summarized in the payment records of the division, or
that are deemed no longer necessary in the proper administration of this
chapter in accordance with the requirements of the state records committee
pursuant to Section 63G-2-502.
